Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-608
City of the second class; internal improvement and railroad aid refunding bonds; issuance; requirements.

The bonds issued under the provisions of section 10-607 shall have recited therein the object of their issue, and the section of the law under which the issue is made, stating the issue to be in pursuance thereof, and shall also state the number, date and amount of the bond or bonds for which it was substituted, and such new bond shall not be delivered until the surrender of the bond or bonds so designated.

Laws 1881, c. 19, § 3, p. 162;

R.S.1913, § 431;

C.S.1922, § 348;

C.S.1929, § 11-607;

R.S.1943, § 10-608.